Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF434.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 2175YH (2) 91 sb/js H.F. 434 Section 1. Section 481A.87, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 5. An owner of property may at any 3 time take an otter on the ownerâs property, subject to the 4 prohibitions provided in sections 481A.91 and 481A.92. 5